New Jersey, session 221, S820.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   A taxpayer shall be allowed to deduct from the taxpayers gross income the amounts paid by the taxpayer during the taxable year for functional improvement expenses or repair and maintenance expenses. b.    In the case of married individuals who file separately, each individual shall be permitted to claim one-half of the deduction allowed pursuant to this section for amounts paid in connection with a primary residence occupied by both individuals during the taxable year. c.     As used in this section: Functional improvement expense means an amount paid by a taxpayer for expenses incurred for the purpose of materially improving the operating condition, and considerably prolonging the useful life, of the primary residence of the taxpayer.  This term is distinguished from, and does not include, work performed that adapts all or part of a residence for new uses, remodels a residence for aesthetic purposes, or does not concern an essential aspect of the habitability of a residence. Primary residence means a residence, located in the State, that is actually and continually occupied by a taxpayer as the permanent residence of the taxpayer; this includes, but is not limited to, a mobile home or a residential unit within a cooperative or mutual housing corporation.  This term is distinguished from, and does not include, a vacation home or other secondary real property. Repair and maintenance expense means an amount paid by a taxpayer for expenses incurred for the purpose of keeping the primary residence of the taxpayer in an ordinarily efficient operating condition.  This term is distinguished from, and does not include, work performed that adapts all or part of a residence for new uses, remodels a residence for aesthetic purposes, or does not concern an essential aspect of the habitability of a residence. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 next following the date of enactment.